Illinois, session 104th, HB1797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Reference to Act. This Act may be referred to as 5the AJ Freund Act. 6    Section 5. The Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act is 7amended by changing Sections 7 and 7.3 as follows: 8    (325 ILCS 5/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2057)9    Sec. 7. Time and manner of making reports. All reports of 10suspected child abuse or neglect made under this Act shall be 11made immediately by telephone to the central register 12established under Section 7.7 on the single, State-wide, 13toll-free telephone number established in Section 7.6, or in 14person or by telephone through the nearest Department office. 15The Department shall, in cooperation with school officials, 16distribute appropriate materials in school buildings listing 17the toll-free telephone number established in Section 7.6, 18including methods of making a report under this Act. The 19Department may, in cooperation with appropriate members of the 20clergy, distribute appropriate materials in churches, 21synagogues, temples, mosques, or other religious buildings 22listing the toll-free telephone number established in Section   HB1797- 2 -LRB104 03970 KTG 13994 b17.6, including methods of making a report under this Act.2    Wherever the Statewide number is posted, there shall also 3be posted the following notice:4    "Any person who knowingly transmits a false report to the 5Department commits the offense of disorderly conduct under 6subsection (a)(7) of Section 26-1 of the Criminal Code of 72012. A violation of this subsection is a Class 4 felony."8    The report required by this Act shall include, if known, 9the name and address of the child and the child's parents or 10other persons having the child's custody; the child's age; the 11nature of the child's condition, including any evidence of 12previous injuries or disabilities; and any other information 13that the person filing the report believes might be helpful in 14establishing the cause of such abuse or neglect and the 15identity of the person believed to have caused such abuse or 16neglect. Reports made to the central register through the 17State-wide, toll-free telephone number shall be immediately 18transmitted by the Department to the appropriate Child 19Protective Service Unit. All such reports alleging the death 20of a child, serious injury to a child, including, but not 21limited to, brain damage, skull fractures, subdural hematomas, 22and internal injuries, torture of a child, malnutrition of a 23child, and sexual abuse to a child, including, but not limited 24to, sexual intercourse, sexual exploitation, sexual 25molestation, and sexually transmitted disease in a child age 2612 and under, shall also be immediately transmitted by the   HB1797- 3 -LRB104 03970 KTG 13994 b1Department to the appropriate local law enforcement agency. 2The Department shall within 24 hours orally notify local law 3enforcement personnel and the office of the State's Attorney 4of the involved county of the receipt of any report alleging 5the death of a child, serious injury to a child, including, but 6not limited to, brain damage, skull fractures, subdural 7hematomas, and internal injuries, torture of a child, 8malnutrition of a child, and sexual abuse to a child, 9including, but not limited to, sexual intercourse, sexual 10exploitation, sexual molestation, and sexually transmitted 11disease in a child age 12 and under. All oral reports made by 12the Department to local law enforcement personnel and the 13office of the State's Attorney of the involved county shall be 14confirmed in writing within 24 hours of the oral report.15    Any report received by the Department alleging the abuse 16or neglect of a child by any a person who is not the child's 17parent, a member of the child's immediate family, a person 18responsible for the child's welfare, an individual residing in 19the same home as the child, or a paramour of the child's parent 20shall immediately be shared with referred to the appropriate 21local law enforcement agency. Upon receipt of the shared 22report, the local law enforcement agency may, in its 23discretion, conduct a criminal investigation or other action 24based on the information contained within the report for 25consideration of criminal investigation or other action. 26    Written confirmation reports from persons not required to   HB1797- 4 -LRB104 03970 KTG 13994 b1report by this Act may be made to the appropriate Child 2Protective Service Unit. Written reports from persons required 3by this Act to report shall be admissible in evidence in any 4judicial proceeding or administrative hearing relating to 5child abuse or neglect. Reports involving known or suspected 6child abuse or neglect in public or private residential 7agencies or institutions shall be made and received in the 8same manner as all other reports made under this Act.9    For purposes of this Section, "child" includes an adult 10resident as defined in this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 12103-624, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    (325 ILCS 5/7.3)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2057.3)14    Sec. 7.3. (a) The Department shall be the sole agency 15responsible for receiving and investigating reports of child 16abuse or neglect made under this Act, including reports of 17adult resident abuse or neglect as defined in this Act, except 18where investigations by other agencies may be required with 19respect to reports alleging the abuse or neglect of a child by 20any person, a person who is not the child's parent, a member of 21the child's immediate family, a person responsible for the 22child's welfare, an individual residing in the same home as 23the child, or a paramour of the child's parent, the death of a 24child, serious injury to a child, or sexual abuse to a child 25made pursuant to Sections 4.1 or 7 of this Act, and except that   HB1797- 5 -LRB104 03970 KTG 13994 b1the Department may delegate the performance of the 2investigation to the Illinois State Police, a law enforcement 3agency and to those private social service agencies which have 4been designated for this purpose by the Department prior to 5July 1, 1980.6    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 7Department shall adopt rules expressly allowing law 8enforcement personnel to investigate reports of suspected 9child abuse or neglect concurrently with the Department, 10without regard to whether the Department determines a report 11to be "indicated" or "unfounded" or deems a report to be 12"undetermined". 13    (c) By June 1, 2016, the Department shall adopt rules that 14address and set forth criteria and standards relevant to 15investigations of reports of abuse or neglect committed by any 16agency, as defined in Section 3 of this Act, or person working 17for an agency responsible for the welfare of a child or adult 18resident. 19(Source: P.A. 101-583, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)